Hawaii statutes.
[§420D‑1] Purpose and findings. This
chapter authorizes a designation and code of conduct for a business corporation
to offer entrepreneurs and investors the option to build and invest in
businesses that operate in a socially and environmentally sustainable manner. Enforcement
of those responsibilities comes not from governmental oversight, but rather
from new provisions on transparency and accountability included in this chapter.
[L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next